Montana, session 2025, HB167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 13-13-233, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-13-233. Issuing and recording absentee ballots -- certificate to election judges. (1) Absentee
ballots must be official numbered paper ballots beginning with ballot number 1 and following consecutively
according to the number of applications for absentee ballots.
(2) The election administrator shall keep a record of all absentee ballots issued.
(3) When the election administrator delivers the voted absentee ballots pursuant to 13-13-232(1),
the The election administrator shall keep a record of the following information subject to the appropriate
retention schedule also provide a certificate stating:
(a) the ballot numbers of the absentee ballots mailed or transmitted pursuant to 13-13-214, 13-21-
106(3)(a), and 13-21-224, delivered pursuant to 13-13-229, or marked in person pursuant to 13-13-222;
(b) the number of ballots to be reserved for late absentee voting pursuant to 13-13-211(2); and
(c) the names of the electors within the precinct to whom the ballots were provided.
(4) The chief election judge shall post in a conspicuous location at the polling place a list of the
names of electors appearing on the certificate required under subsection (3)."
SECTION 2. Section 13-13-234, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-13-234. Duty of election judges -- pollbook. (1) The election judges, at the opening of the polls,
shall:
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 167
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0167
(a) note on the pollbook opposite the appropriate ballot numbers the fact that the ballots were
issued as absentee ballots; and
(b) reserve the numbers for electors who may vote late under 13-13-211(2).
(2) The election judges shall insert only the name of the elector entitled to each particular number
according to the certificate provided by the election administrator pursuant to 13-13-233(3) and the number of
the elector's ballot."
Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 167
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 167, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 167
INTRODUCED BY J. DARLING, W. MCKAMEY, S. VANCE
AN ACT REMOVING THE REQUIREMENT TO POST ABSENTEE LISTS AT POLLING LOCATIONS;
AMENDING SECTION SECTIONS 13-13-233, AND 13-13-234, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE
EFFECTIVE DATE.”